CIK: 898437
Company Name: ANIKA THERAPEUTICS INC 
Form Type : 10-K
Filing Date: 2021-03-05
Accession Number: 0001171843-21-001573


ITEM 1 BUSINESS Overview Founded in 1992, Anika Therapeutics, Inc. is a global joint preservation company that creates and delivers meaningful advancements in early intervention orthopedic care. Based on our collaborations with clinicians to understand what they need most to treat their patients, we develop minimally invasive products that restore active living for people around the world. We are committed to leading in high opportunity spaces within orthopedics, including osteoarthritis ( OA ) pain management, regenerative solutions, soft tissue repair and b1 preserving joint technologies. We have nearly thirty years of global expertise developing, manufacturing and commercializing products based on our hyaluronic acid, or HA, technology platform. HA is a naturally occurring polymer found throughout the body that is vital for proper joint health and tissue function. Our proprietary technologies for modifying the HA molecule allow product properties to be tailored specifically to multiple uses, including enabling longer residence time to support OA pain management and creating a solid form of HA called HYAFF, which is the platform for our regenerative solutions portfolio. In early 2020, we expanded our overall technology platform and significantly enhanced our commercial infrastructure, especially in the United States, through our strategic acquisitions of Parcus Medical, LLC, or Parcus Medical, a sports medicine implant and instrumentation solutions provider focused on sports medicine and soft tissue repair, and Arthrosurface, Inc., or Arthrosurface, a company specializing in less invasive, b1 preserving partial and total joint replacement solutions. Through these acquisitions, we have transformed our company. We expanded our addressable market from the over $1 billion global OA pain management market to the over $8 billion joint preservation market (which includes the faster growing sports medicine and extremities segments), improved our commercial capabilities, and expanded our product pipeline and research and development expertise in our target markets. As we look towards the future, our business is positi1d to capture value within our target market of joint preservation. We believe our success will be driven by our Decades of experience in HA based regenerative solutions and early intervention orthopedics combined under new, common management with a strong financial foundation for future investment in meaningful solutions for our customers; Robust ne2rk of stakeholders in our target markets to identify evolving unmet patient treatment needs; Prioritized investment in differentiated research and development programs; Expansion of our commercial capabilities globally within joint preservation; Opportunity to pursue strategic inorganic growth opportunities, including potential partnerships and acquisitions, leveraging our strong financial foundation and operational capabilities; and Energized and experienced team focused on strong values, talent, and culture. 5 Products Joint Pain Management Our Joint Pain Management product family consists of Monovisc and Orthovisc, our single and multi injection, HA based viscosupplement offerings indicated to provide pain relief from OA conditions. Our Joint Pain Management products are generally administered to patients in an office setting. In the United States, Monovisc and Orthovisc are marketed exclusively by DePuy Synthes Mitek Sports Medicine, part of the Johnson & Johnson Medical Companies, or Mitek, and have been the market leaders, based on combined overall revenue in the viscosupplement market since 2018. Internationally, we market our Joint Pain Management products through a robust and growing worldwide ne2rk of commercial distributors. Cingal, our novel, third generation, single injection OA product consisting of our proprietary cross linked HA material combined with a steroid, is designed to provide both short and long term pain relief. Cingal is CE Mark approved and has been sold outside the United States in over 35 countries through our ne2rk of distributors for several years. In the United States, Cingal is a pipeline product under clinical development; for additional information please see the section capti1d Item 1 Business. Research and Development. Hyvisc, our high molecular weight injectable HA veterinary product for the treatment of joint dysfunction in horses due to non infectious synovitis associated with equine OA. Hyvisc is distributed by Boehringer Ingelheim Vetmedica, Inc., or Boehringer, in the United States. Joint Preservation and Restoration Our Joint Preservation and Restoration product family consists of B1 Preserving Joint Technologies . Our portfolio of more than 150 b1 preserving joint technologies, including partial joint replacement, joint resurfacing, and minimally invasive and b1 sparing implants, is designed to treat upper and lower extremity orthopedic conditions caused by trauma, injury and arthritic disease. These products span multiple joints including the shoulder, foot ankle, wrist, knee and hip and are generally intended to mimic a patient natural anatomy to the extent feasible. These products are often used to treat patients with OA progression beyond where our Joint Pain Management products can allow them to retain an active lifestyle and early surgical intervention becomes preferable. We commercialize these products in the United States and utilize our distributor ne2rk for sales in certain international markets. Soft Tissue Repair . Our line of soft tissue repair solutions is used by surgeons to repair and reconstruct damaged ligaments and tendons resulting from sports injuries, trauma and disease. These more traditional sports medicine solutions include screws, sutures, suture anchors, and other surgical systems that facilitate surgical procedures on the shoulder, knee, hip, upper and lower extremities, and other soft tissues. We commercialize these products in the United States and utilize our distributor ne2rk for sales in over 60 international markets. Regenerative Solutions . Our portfolio of orthopedic regenerative solutions based on our proprietary HA and Hyaff technologies, which is a solid form of HA. These products include Tactoset, an HA enhanced injectable b1 repair therapy designed to treat insufficiency fractures that we commercialize only in the United States, and Hyalofast, a biodegradable support for human b1 marrow mesenchymal stem cells used for cartilage regeneration and as an adjunct for microfracture surgery. Hyalofast is CE Mark approved and currently available in Europe, South America, Asia, and certain other international markets. In the United States, Hyalofast is a pipeline product under clinical development; for additional information please see the section capti1d Item 1 Business. Research and Development. 6 Other Our Other product family consists of legacy HA based products that do not fit into 1 of our other primary product categories. These products include, Hyalobarrier, an anti adhesion barrier indicated for use after abdomino pelvic surgeries, and Hyalomatrix, which is used for the treatment of complex wounds such as burns and ulcers, products used in connection with the treatment of ears, nose and throat disorders, and ophthalmic products, including injectable, high molecular weight HA products used as viscoelastic agents in ophthalmic surgical procedures such as cataract extraction and intraocular lens implantation. Sales Channels A substantial majority of our products are used by clinicians and surgeons in 1 of 2 environments office based procedures usually focused on injections, or surgical settings, including hospital operating rooms and ambulatory surgery centers, or ASCs. These settings typically require different commercial approaches and have distinct call points, which requires diversity in our sales approach. For instance, our Joint Pain Management family and certain products in our Other category are almost entirely utilized in an office based setting while our Joint Preservation and Restoration products are almost exclusively consumed in hospital operating rooms or ASCs. As a result of these distinctions, we employ multiple sales models in the United States to ensure that we are meeting the needs of our customers and other healthcare system stakeholders. For many years, we have maintained a mutually beneficial commercial partnership with Mitek, which sells Orthovisc and Monovisc throughout the United States. We also have other U.S. commercial partnerships for certain other products in our Joint Pain Management and Other product families. Under these commercial partnerships, we sell our products directly to our partners, which perform the vast majority of the downstream sales and marketing activities to customers and end users. In addition to a transfer price, we may also structure our arrangements to receive a royalty on end user sales. Since 2019, and with our expanded commercial infrastructure as a result of the Parcus Medical and Arthrosurface acquisitions, we have sold our Joint Preservation and Restoration family directly to customers, including hospitals and ASCs, through our direct sales representatives and large ne2rk of independent third party distributors. Within this framework, we employ selling models that seek to maximize the benefit for our company and our customers, including contracts with group purchasing organizations and certain fixed price delivery models. During 2020, we completed the integration of our U.S. commercial organization including effecting cross training to sell the consolidated Joint Preservation and Restoration product portfolio. For business outside of the United States, we market and sell our products using a worldwide ne2rk of commercial partners to provide a solid foundation for revenue growth and territorial expansion. Our relationships with these partners are generally structured such that we sell our products to these partners directly while they, with global support from our team, perform the in country sales and marketing activities to drive growth and adoption locally. We expect to generally maintain this model for the foreseeable future, while also selectively evaluating other options and being opportunistic about adopting other models, including direct sales, in certain jurisdictions. We believe that our overall sales approach provides our business with a strong base to drive revenue growth as we continue to grow and scale our commercial infrastructure while retaining the flexibility in certain circumstances to enter into strategic arrangements to take advantage of the benefits certain other organizations have established for themselves. We will continue to focus on expanding our own commercial capabilities, including with respect to market access, innovative sales and delivery models, and improved logistics management. Manufacturing We manufacture all of our HA based products, including all of our Joint Pain Management products and certain additional products, at our facility in Bedford, Massachusetts, where we have developed significant know how around procedures such as homogenized mixing and filling of highly viscous liquids and manipulation of solid HA into scaffolds or other presentations. We have a substantial manufacturing presence at our facility in Sarasota, Florida, and we engage third party organizations as contract manufacturers for a number of our products including our b1 preserving joint technologies. 7 The raw materials necessary to manufacture our products are generally available from multiple sources. However, we rely on a small number of suppliers for certain key raw materials and a small number of suppliers for certain other materials required for the manufacturing and delivery of these products. Research and Development Our research and development efforts primarily consist of the development of new medical applications for our technology platforms, the development of intellectual property with respect to our technology platforms, the management of clinical trials for certain product candidates, the preparation and processing of applications for regulatory clearances and approvals, and process development and scale up manufacturing activities for our existing and new product development initiatives. For 2020, 2019, and 2018, research and development expenses were $234 million, $16.7 million and $18.2 million respectively. The increase in 2020 was primarily due to preparation activities and initial execution related to the clinical studies in the United States for Cingal and Hyalofast, certain European post market clinical studies, and activities associated with new product development in our research and development pipeline, including the acquisitions of Arthrosurface and Parcus Medical in early 2020. We anticipate that we will continue to commit significant resources to research and development activities, including in relation to new product development, pre clinical activities and clinical trials. Our new product development efforts focus on products in four large and growing orthopedic markets to drive long term growth OA pain management, regenerative solutions, soft tissue repair and b1 preserving joint technologies. In order to better inform and target our research and development investment, we routinely interact with key external stakeholders to leverage customer and patient insights in our development process that help ensure we bring needed solutions to the market. In the near term, our general new product development will be focused on enhancements to existing products, new soft tissue fixation and extremities products like our WristMotion product that recently achieved 510(k) clearance from the U.S. Food and Drug Administration, or FDA, and clinical development to enable us to commercialize in the U.S. market our Cingal and Hyalofast products, which are currently sold only outside the United States. As we move forward, we plan to continue to invest in novel and meaningful products for our target markets based on our core capabilities, including our regenerative HA technology platform and manufacturing expertise. Our development focus for OA pain management will continue to be on bringing Cingal, our third generation, single injection viscosupplement product, to the U.S. market. While we have conducted previous clinical trials for Cingal, including a trial that supported CE Mark approval for Cingal, the FDA has indicated an additional Phase III trial is necessary to support U.S. approval. In 2020, we initiated a pilot study to confirm our trial design to increase our probability of success in a Phase III trial and generate data that ultimately will be needed to support FDA approval. Several trial sites were activated during 2020, and the first patient was enrolled in the pilot study in September 2020. However, as a result of the COVID 19 pandemic, we continue to face uncertainty related to the ultimate timing of this Cingal pilot study due to COVID 19 related enrollment challenges. Given the evolving environment, we will continue to update clinical trial timelines as we have more visibility with respect to the length and regional impacts of the COVID 19 pandemic. For additional information on the impact of the COVID 19 pandemic on our Cingal pilot study, please refer to the section capti1d Item 1A. Risk Factors. Risks related to the COVID 19 Pandemic. The COVID 19 pandemic could adversely impact our development activities, preclinical studies and clinical trials, which could significantly impair our long term business plans and operating results. Development for our Joint Preservation and Restoration family is focused in several areas. We continue to progress the ongoing clinical trial to support approval in the United States for Hyalofast, our single step cartilage repair therapy, currently sold only outside the United States. We are actively pursuing multiple solutions to accelerate patient enrollment, including initiating sites in Mexico, Ind1sia, and the Philippines which has been delayed due to COVID 19. We are also focused on the development of additional solutions and line extensions for our soft tissue repair and b1 preserving joint technologies business, largely within the faster growing extremities segments. These include continued progress on a therapy targeted at rotator cuff repair utilizing our proprietary solid HA technology, as well as other programs that leverage our HA expertise to augment or improve our current offerings. 8 Intellectual Property We seek patent and trademark protection for our key technologies, products and product improvements, both in the U.S. and in select foreign countries. When determined appropriate, we enforce and plan to enforce and defend our patent and trademark rights. While we rely on our patent and trademark portfolio to provide us with competitive advantages as it relates to our existing and future product lines, it is not our sole source of protection. We also rely upon trade secrets and continuing technological innovations to develop and maintain our competitive position. Governmental Regulation The clinical development, manufacturing, and marketing of our products are subject to governmental regulation in the United States, the European Union, and other territories worldwide. Various statutes, regulations and interpretations thereof, directives, and guidelines, including the Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act in the United States, govern the development, design, non clinical and clinical research, testing, manufacture, safety, efficacy, labeling, packaging, storage, record keeping, premarket clearance or approval, adverse event reporting, advertising, and promotion of our products. Product development and approval within these various regulatory frameworks can take a number of years and generally involves the expenditure of substantial resources. Pharmaceutical and medical device manufacturers are also inspected regularly by the FDA and other applicable regulatory bodies. Medical products regulated by the FDA are generally classified as drugs, biologics, or medical devices, and the current classification standards for our current or future products may be altered over time. Drugs and biologic products undergo rigorous preclinical testing prior to beginning clinical trials. Clinical trials for new drugs or biologic products include Phase I trials in healthy volunteers to understand safety, dosage tolerance, and pharmacokinetics, Phase II trials in a limited patient population to identify initial efficacy and side effects, and Phase III pivotal trials to statistically evaluate the safety and efficacy of the product. Medical devices intended for human use are classified into 3 categories (Class I, II or III) on the basis of the controls deemed reasonably necessary by the FDA to assure their safety and effectiveness. Class II devices are cleared for marketing under the pre market notification 510(k) regulatory pathway, which may include clinical testing. Class III devices require pre market approval based on valid scientific evidence of safety and effectiveness, including evidence elicited through appropriate clinical testing. The failure to adequately demonstrate the quality, safety, and efficacy of a product under development can delay or prevent regulatory approval of the product. In order to gain marketing approval, we must submit to the relevant regulatory authority for review information on the quality aspects of the product as well as the non clinical and clinical data. The FDA undertakes this review in the United States. In the European Union, medical devices must be CE Marked in order to be marketed. CE marking a device involves working with a Notified Body, and in some cases a Competent Authority, to demonstrate that the device meets all applicable requirements of the Medical Devices Directive and that the Quality Management System is compliant. Europe Medical Device Directive, or MDD, is being replaced by the European Medical Device Regulation, or MDR, enacted in 2017, and due for implementation in May 2021 MDR requirements will phase in on a product by product basis as certifications under MDD lapse and will require all products to undergo review and approval under these new regulations, which will generally require increased levels of clinical support as compared to MDD requirements. Drug approval in the European Union follows 1 of several possible processes (i) a centralized procedure involving members of the European Medicines Agency Committee for Medicinal Products for Human Use; (ii) a mutual recognition procedure in which an individual country's regulatory agency approves the product followed by mutual recognition of this approval by regulatory agencies of other countries; or (iii) a decentralized procedure in which the approval is sought through the regulatory agencies of multiple countries at the same time. Approval timelines can range from several months to several years, or applications can be denied entirely. Product or product comp1nt classifications as drugs, biologics, or medical devices may change over time due to new regulations or augmented interpretation of data or current regulations. The approval process can be affected by a number of factors. For example, additional studies or clinical trials may be requested during the review, which may delay marketing approval and involve unbudgeted costs. As a condition of approval, the regulatory agency may require post marketing surveillance to monitor for adverse effects, and may require other additional studies, as it deems appropriate. After approval for an initial indication, further clinical studies are generally necessary to gain approval for any additional indications. The terms of any approval, including labeling content, may be more restrictive than expected and could affect the marketability of a product. 9 The FDA has broad regulatory compliance and enforcement powers. If the FDA determines that we failed to comply with applicable regulatory requirements, it can take a variety of compliance or enforcement actions, including, without limitation, issuing an FDA Form 483 notice of inspectional observations or a warning letter, imposing civil m1y penalties, suspending or delaying issuance of approvals, requiring product recall, imposing a total or partial shutdown of production, withdrawal of approvals or clearances already granted, pursuing product seizures, consent decrees or other injunctive relief, or criminal prosecution through the Department of Justice. The FDA can also require us to repair, replace, or refund the cost of products that we manufactured or distributed. Outside the United States, regulatory agencies may exert a range of similar powers. We are subject to various U.S. federal and state laws pertaining to healthcare fraud and abuse, including anti kickback, false claims, and transparency reporting laws. Similar review and regulation of advertising and marketing practices exists in the other geographic areas where we operate. We are also subject to various laws and regulations concerning data privacy in the United States, Europe, and elsewhere, including the General Data Protection Regulation ( GDPR ) in the European Union. These regulations impose several requirements on the processing, administration, security, and confidentiality of personal data and empower enforcement agencies to impose large penalties for noncompliance. Environmental Laws We believe that we are in compliance with all foreign, federal, state, and local environmental regulations with respect to our manufacturing facilities. The cost of ongoing compliance with such regulations does not have a material effect on our operations. Competition We compete with many companies including large pharmaceutical firms and large and specialized medical device companies across our product lines. For our Joint Pain Management products, our principal competitors include Sanofi Genzyme, Zimmer Biomet, Inc., Bioventus Inc., and Ferring Pharmaceuticals, as well as other companies that are commercializing or developing competitive products. Our key competitors for our Joint Preservation and Restoration products include Arthrex, Inc., the DePuy Synthes Companies of Johnson & Johnson, Smith & Nephew PLC., Stryker Corporation, and Zimmer Biomet, Inc., as well as certain smaller organizations that focus on subsets of the larger industry. Many of these companies have substantially greater financial resources, larger research and development staffs, more extensive marketing and manufacturing organizations, and more experience in the regulatory processes than we have. We also compete with academic institutions, government agencies, and other research organizations that may be involved in the research and development and commercialization of products. Many of our competitors also compete against us in securing relationships with collaborators for their research and development and commercialization programs. We compete with other market participants primarily on the efficacy of our products, our products reputation for safety, and the breadth of our overall product portfolio. Other factors that impact competition in our industry are the timing and scope of regulatory approvals, the availability of raw material and finished product supply, marketing and sales capability, reimbursement coverage, product pricing, and patent protection. Some of the principal factors that may affect our ability to compete in our target markets include The quality and breadth of our continued development of our product portfolio; Our ability to complete successful clinical studies and obtain FDA marketing and foreign regulatory approvals prior to our competitors; 10 Our ability to continue to build our commercial infrastructure, integrate our sales channels and execute our sales strategies; The execution by our key partners of their commercial strategies for our products and our ability to manage our relationships with those key partners; Our ability to recruit and retain skilled employees; and The availability of capital resources to fund strategic activities related to the significant expansion of our business or product portfolio, including through acquisitions of third parties or certain assets. We are aware of a number of companies that are developing and or marketing competitive products. In some cases, competitors have already obtained product approvals, submitted applications for approval, or commenced human clinical studies, either in the United States or in certain foreign countries. All products face substantial competition. There is a risk that we will be unable to compete effectively against our current or future competitors. Additionally, legislation and regulation aimed at curbing rising healthcare costs has resulted in a consolidation trend in the healthcare industry to create larger companies, including hospitals, with greater market power. In turn, this has led to greater and more intense competition in the provision of products and services to market participants. Important market makers, like group purchasing organizations and integrated delivery ne2rks, have increased their negotiating leverage, and if these market makers demand significant price concessions or if we are excluded as a supplier by these market makers, our product revenue could be adversely impacted. Seasonality Our business is generally not seasonal in nature due to the nature of our product mix and sales channels and strategies. Human Capital Management We believe that creating a diverse, talented, and inclusive workplace is a central aspect to our culture, employee engagement, innovation, operational excellence and overall performance. In turn, this culture and drive for performance is an important factor in our ability to attract and retain qualified employees and key talent. Our culture is centered around our fundamental values of People we engage and invest in each other in a community that values diversity and inclusion. Innovation we are agile and entrepreneurial in developing and delivering meaningful solutions to our healthcare stakeholders within our target markets. Quality we strive for the highest quality and compliance in everything we do. Teamwork we operate with mutual respect and trust and are collaborative as we grow together. Integrity we live up to our promises and do the right thing, every day. Accountability we are empowered and accountable to deliver results and value to all of our stakeholders. Our industry requires complex processes for product development and commercialization, each of which requires deep expertise and experience across a broad array of disciplines. Medical device companies therefore compete for a limited number of qualified applicants to fill specialized positions, which requires competitive compensation and benefits packages and an attractive culture, among other things. As of December 31, 2020, we employed 277 fulltime employees at four physical facilities primarily located in Bedford, Massachusetts; Franklin, Massachusetts; Sarasota, Florida; and Padova, Italy. The Franklin and Sarasota sites were added in 2020 as a result of acquisitions of Arthrosurface and Parcus Medical, respectively. We grew our employee base by 145 people in 2020, 75 of which were a direct result of the companies we acquired. Twenty five of our employees are located outside the United States. 11 We expect to continue to add employees in 2021 and beyond as we grow our business. To attract and retain qualified employees and key talent, we offer total rewards packages to every employee consisting of base salary, a potential cash bonus based on individual and company performance, and a comprehensive benefit package, as well as equity compensation for certain employees based on various criteria including their level within the company. Bonus opportunity and equity compensation increase as a percentage of total compensation based on level of responsibility. A large number of our employees have obtained advanced degrees in their professions. We support our employees further development with individualized development plans, mentoring, coaching, group training, conference attendance and financial support, including tuition reimbursement. We believe that employees understanding how their work contributes to our overall strategy and performance is key to our success. In order to communicate with respect to these important topics in manners that are engaging to our team, we utilize a variety of channels, including all employee town hall meetings with senior management, regular email updates from our chief executive officer and other key members of the executive team, and employee engagement surveys. As a result of the COVID 19 pandemic, we have augmented certain of our normal business practices to ensure that we promote health and safety for our employees. We have established safety policies and protocols, and we regularly update our employees with respect to any changes. We transiti1d much of our administrative workforce to work remotely in order to prioritize the health of those who must be onsite to perform their jobs, including our manufacturing staff, and we have adjusted attendance policies to encourage those who may be ill to stay home. We have provided an abundance of personal protective equipment and cleaning supplies. We require masks to be worn in our facilities and have prohibited all non essential domestic and international travel for all employees. We have also provided general information updates and support for our employees to ensure that they have resources and information to protect their health and that of those around them, including their families and co workers. Product Liability The testing, marketing, and sale of human health care products entail an inherent risk of allegations of product liability, and we cannot assure that substantial product liability claims will not be asserted against us. Although we have not received any material product liability claims to date, we cannot assure that if material claims arise in the future, our insurance will be adequate to cover all situations. Moreover, we cannot assure that such insurance, or additional insurance, if required, will be available in the future or, if available, will be available on commercially reasonable terms. Any product liability claim, if successful, could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition, and results of operations. Available Information We are required to file annual, quarterly and current reports, proxy statements and other information with the SEC. The SEC maintains a website at www.sec.gov that contains reports, proxy and information statements, and other information regarding issuers that file electronically with the SEC. Our Annual Reports on Form 10 K, Quarterly Reports on Form 10 Q, Current Reports on Form 8 K, proxy statements, and other information, including amendments and exhibits to such reports, filed or furnished pursuant to the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 are available free of charge in the SEC Filings section of our website located at http www.anika.com, as soon as reasonably practicable after the reports are electronically filed with or furnished to the SEC. The information on our website is not part of this Annual Report on Form 10 K. 12 ITEM 1A. RISK FACTORS Our operating results and financial condition have varied in the past and could vary significantly in the future depending on a number of factors. You should consider carefully the risks and uncertainties described below, in addition to the other information contained in this Annual Report on Form 10 K, before deciding whether to purchase our common stock. If any of the following risks actually occurs, our business, financial condition, results of operations, and future prospects could be materially and adversely affected. In that event, the trading price of our common stock could decline, and stockholders could lose part or all of their investment. Risks Related to Our Business and Industry Our financial performance depends on sales growth and increasing demand for our legacy and acquired product portfolios, and we may not be able to successfully manage the recent, and future, expansion of our operations. Through our acquisitions of Parcus Medical and Arthrosurface in early 2020, we significantly broadened our technology and development platforms and commercialization infrastructure and expanded our addressable market from the global OA pain management market to the substantially larger joint preservation market. Our future success depends on growth in sales of both our legacy and acquired products. There can be no assurance that such growth can be achieved or, if achieved, sustained. There can be no assurance that, even if substantial growth in product sales and the demand for our products is achieved, we will be able to Gain acceptance of our broadened portfolio of existing products, as well as future products, by the medical community, hospitals, physicians, other health care providers, third party payers, and end users, which acceptance may depend upon the extent to which the medical community and end users perceive our products as safer, more effective or more cost competitive than other similar products. Maintain, manage, and develop the necessary manufacturing capabilities and inventory management practices; Develop, implement, and integrate the mix of appropriate sales channels needed to generate increased sales across our expanded product platform and to develop marketing partners and viable commercial strategies for the distribution of our expanded mix of products; Attract, retain, and integrate required key personnel; and Implement the financial, accounting, and management systems needed to manage our expanded business and growing demand for our products. There can be no assurance that our acquired, and future, products will achieve significant market acceptance on a timely basis, or at all. Failure of some or all of our future products to achieve significant market acceptance, or our failure to successfully manage future growth, could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition, and results of operations. Substantial competition could materially affect our financial performance. We compete with many companies, including large pharmaceutical companies and large and specialized medical devices companies, across all of our product lines. Many of these companies have substantially greater financial resources, larger research and development staffs, more extensive marketing and manufacturing organizations, and more experience in the regulatory process than us. We also compete with academic institutions, government agencies, and other research organizations that are involved in the research and development and commercialization of products similar to our own. Many of our competitors also compete against us in securing relationships with collaborators for their research and development and commercialization programs. Because a number of companies are developing or have developed products for similar applications as our products and have received the U.S. Food and Drug Administration, or FDA, approval, the successful commercialization of a particular product will depend in part upon our ability to complete clinical studies and or obtain FDA marketing and foreign regulatory approvals prior to our competitors, or, if regulatory approval is not obtained prior to our competitors, to identify markets for our products that may be sufficient to permit meaningful sales of our products. Additionally, legislation and regulation aimed at curbing rising healthcare costs has resulted in a consolidation trend in the healthcare industry to create larger companies, including hospitals, with greater market power. In turn, this has led to greater and more intense competition in the provision of products and services to market participants. Important market makers, like group purchasing organizations and integrated delivery ne2rks, have increased their negotiating leverage, and if these market makers demand significant price concessions or if we are excluded as a supplier by these market makers, our product revenue could be adversely impacted. There can be no assurance that we will be able to compete against current or future competitors or that competition will not have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition, and results of operations. 13 Our business may be adversely affected if consolidation in the healthcare industry leads to demand for price concessions or if we are excluded from being a supplier by a group purchasing organization or similar entity. Because healthcare costs have risen significantly over the past decade, numerous initiatives and reforms have been launched by legislators, regulators, and third party payers to curb these costs. As a result, there has been a consolidation trend in the healthcare industry to create larger companies, including hospitals, with greater market power. As the healthcare industry consolidates, competition to provide products and services to industry participants has become and may continue to become more intense. This may result in greater pricing pressures and the exclusion of certain suppliers from important markets as group purchasing organizations, independent delivery ne2rks, and large single accounts continue to use their market power to consolidate purchasing decisions. If a group purchasing organization excludes us from being 1 of their suppliers, our net sales could be adversely impacted. We expect that market demand, government regulation, third party reimbursement policies, and societal pressures will continue to change the worldwide healthcare industry, which may exert further downward pressure on the prices of our products. A significant portion of our revenues are derived from a small number of customers, the loss of which could materially adversely affect our business, financial condition and results of operations. We have historically derived the majority of our revenues from a small number of customers who resell our products to end users, and most of these customers are significantly larger companies than us. In 2020 five customers accounted for 58% of product revenue, with DePuy Synthes Mitek Sports Medicine, part of the Johnson & Johnson Medical Companies, or Mitek, al1 accounting for 49% of product revenue. While we have substantially and successfully diversified our sales channels, including through the implementation of a direct commercial model in the United States, we expect to continue to be dependent on a small number of large customers for a substantial portion. The failure of key customers to purchase our products in the amounts they historically have or in amounts that we expect would seriously harm our business. In addition, if present and future customers terminate their purchasing arrangements with us, significantly reduce or delay their orders, or seek to renegotiate their agreements on terms less favorable to us, our business, financial condition, and results of operations will be adversely affected. If we accept terms less favorable than the terms of the current agreements, such renegotiations may have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition, and or results of operations. Furthermore, in any future negotiations we may be subject to the perceived or actual leverage that these customers may have given their relative size and importance to us. Any termination, change, reduction, or delay in orders could seriously harm our business, financial condition, and results of operations. The loss of any 1 of our major customers or the delay of significant orders from such customers, even if only temporary, could reduce or delay our recognition of revenues, harm our reputation in the industry, and reduce our ability to accurately predict cash flow, and, as a consequence, it could seriously harm our business, financial condition, and results of operations. We experience quarterly sales volume variation, which makes our future results difficult to predict and makes period to period comparisons potentially not meaningful. We experience quarterly fluctuations in our products sales as a result of multiple factors, many of which are outside of our control. These quarterly fluctuations create uncertainty as to the volume of sales that we may achieve in a given period. As a result, comparing our operating results on a period to period basis might not be meaningful. You should not rely on our past results as an indication of our future performance. Our operating results could be disproportionately affected by a reduction in revenue because a proportionately smaller amount of our expenses varies with our revenue. As a result, our quarterly operating results are difficult to predict, even in the near term. 14 We rely on a small number of suppliers for certain key raw materials and a small number of suppliers for a number of other materials required for the manufacturing and delivery of our products, and disruption could materially adversely affect our business, financial condition, and results of operations. Although we believe that alternative sources for many of these and other comp1nts and raw materials that we use in our manufacturing processes are available, we cannot be certain that the supply of key raw materials will continue to be available at current levels or will be sufficient to meet our future needs. For the manufacture of b1 preserving joint technologies, we engage a single third party organization as a contract manufacturer. Any supply interruption could harm our ability to manufacture our products until a new source of supply is identified and qualified. We may not be able to find sufficient alternative suppliers in a reasonable time period, or on commercially reasonable terms, if at all, and our ability to produce and supply our products could be impaired. Our manufacturing processes involve inherent risks, and disruption could materially adversely affect our business, financial condition, and results of operations. The operation of biomedical manufacturing plants involves many risks, including the risks of breakdown, failure, or substandard performance of equipment, the need to comply with the requirements of directives of government agencies, including the FDA, and the occurrence of natural and other disasters. Such occurrences could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition, and results of operations during the period of such operational difficulties and beyond. We could become subject to product liability claims, which, if successful, could materially adversely affect our business, financial condition, and results of operations. The testing, marketing, and sale of human health care products entail an inherent risk of allegations of product liability, and there can be no assurance that substantial product liability claims will not be asserted against us. Although we have not received any material product liability claims to date and believe that we have adequate insurance coverage to cover such product liability claims should they arise, there can be no assurance that material claims will not arise in the future or that our insurance will be adequate to cover all situations. Moreover, there can be no assurance that such insurance, or additional insurance, if required, will be available in the future or, if available, will be available on commercially reasonable terms. Any product liability claim, if successful, could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition, and results of operations. We are increasingly dependent on sophisticated information technology and if we fail to effectively maintain or protect our information systems or data, including from data breaches, our business could be adversely affected. We are increasingly dependent on sophisticated information technology for our products and infrastructure. As a result of technology initiatives, recently enacted regulations, changes in our system platforms and integration of new business acquisitions, we have been consolidating and integrating the number of systems we operate and have upgraded and expanded our information systems capabilities. We also have outsourced elements of our operations to third parties, and, as a result, we manage a number of third party suppliers who may or could have access to our confidential intellectual property or business information. Our information systems, and those of third party suppliers with whom we contract, require an ongoing commitment of significant resources to maintain, protect and enhance existing systems and develop new systems to keep pace with continuing changes in information technology, evolving systems and regulatory standards and the increasing need to protect patient and customer information. In addition, given their size and complexity, these systems could be vulnerable to service interruptions or to security breaches from inadvertent or intentional actions by our employees, third party suppliers and or business partners, or from cyber attacks by malicious third parties attempting to gain unauthorized access to our products, systems or Confidential Information. Any such compromise to our information security could result in an interruption in our operations, the unauthorized publication of our confidential business or proprietary information, the unauthorized release of customer, vendor, or employee data, the violation of privacy, including under the General Data Protection Regulation, or GDPR, in the European Union, or other laws and exposure to litigation, any of which could harm our business and operating results. 15 We may face circumstances in the future that will result in impairment charges, including, but not limited to, goodwill impairment and in process research and development charges. As of December 31, 2020, we had long lived assets, including goodwill and in process research and development charges, of $149.8 million. If the fair value of any of our long lived assets, including those that we acquired in the acquisitions of Arthrosurface and Parcus Medical, decreases as a result of an economic slowdown, a downturn in the markets where we sell products and services, a downturn in our financial performance or future outlook, or other reasons, we may be required to record an impairment charge on such assets. We are required to test intangible assets with indefinite life periods for potential impairment annually and on an interim basis if there are indicators of a potential impairment. We also are required to evaluate amortizable intangible assets and fixed assets for impairment if there are indicators of a possible impairment. Impairment charges could have a negative impact on our results of operations and financial position, as well as on the market price of our common stock. Our business is dependent upon hiring and retaining qualified management and technical personnel. We are highly dependent on the members of our management and technical staff, the loss of 1 or more of whom could have a material adverse effect on us. We have experienced a number of management changes in recent years, and there can be no assurances that any future management changes will not adversely affect our business. During 2020 we appointed Cheryl R. Blanchard, Ph.D. as our President and Chief Executive Officer and Michael Levitz as our Executive Vice President, Chief Financial Officer, and Treasurer. We may face challenges building our business in accordance with our strategy as result of having both a chief executive officer and a chief financial officer that are relatively new to our company. We believe that our future success will depend in large part upon our ability to attract and retain technical and highly skilled executive, managerial, professional, and technical personnel. We face significant competition for such personnel from competitive companies, research and academic institutions, government entities, and other organizations. There can be no assurance that we will be successful in hiring or retaining the personnel we require. The failure to hire and retain such personnel could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition, and results of operations. We may require capital in the future. We cannot give any assurance that such capital will be available at all or on terms acceptable to us, and if it is available, additional capital raised by us could dilute your ownership interest or the value of your shares. We may need to raise capital in the future depending on numerous factors, including Market acceptance of our existing and future products; The success and sales of our products under various distributor agreements and other appropriate commercial strategies, including the ability of our partners to achieve third party reimbursement for our products; The successful commercialization of products in development through appropriate commercial models and marketing channels; Progress in our product development efforts; The magnitude and scope of such product development efforts; Any potential acquisitions of products, technologies, or businesses; Progress with preclinical studies, clinical trials, and product approvals and clearances by the FDA and other agencies; 16 The cost and timing of our efforts to manage our manufacturing capabilities and related costs; The cost of filing, prosecuting, defending, and enforcing patent claims and other intellectual property rights and the cost of defending any other legal proceeding; Competing technological and market developments; The development of strategic alliances for the marketing of certain of our products; The terms of such strategic alliances, including provisions (and our ability to satisfy such provisions) that provide upfront and or milest1 payments to us; The cost of maintaining adequate inventory levels to meet current and future product demand; and Further expanding our business in international markets. To the extent funds generated from our operations, together with our existing capital resources, are insufficient to meet future requirements, we will be required to obtain additional funds through equity or debt financings, through strategic alliances with corporate partners and others, or through other sources. The terms of any future equity financings may be dilutive to our investors and the terms of any debt financings may contain restrictive covenants, which limit our ability to pursue certain courses of action. Our ability to obtain financing is dependent on the status of our future business prospects as well as conditions prevailing in the relevant capital markets at the time we seek financing. No assurance can be given that any additional financing will be made available to us or will be available on acceptable terms should such a need arise. If we succeed in raising additional funds through the issuance of equity or convertible securities, then the issuance could result in substantial dilution to existing stockholders. Furthermore, the holders of these new securities or debt may have rights, preferences and privileges senior to those of the holders of common stock. In addition, any preferred equity issuance or debt financing that we may obtain in the future could have restrictive covenants relating to our capital raising activities and other financial and operational matters, which may make it more difficult for us to obtain additional capital and to pursue business opportunities, including potential acquisitions. Risks Related to Our Commercialization Activities Our license agreements with Mitek provide substantial control of Monovisc and Orthovisc in the United States to Mitek, and Mitek actions could have a material impact on our business, financial condition and results of operations. Our license and distribution agreements with Mitek related to Monovisc and Orthovisc provide Mitek with, among other things, the exclusive right to market and sell Monovisc and Orthovisc in the United States, unilateral decision making authority over the sale, price, and promotion of Monovisc and Orthovisc, substantial control over the future development of Monovisc and Orthovisc related to the treatment of pain associated with osteoarthritis, a license to manufacture and have manufactured such products in the event that we are unable to supply Mitek with Monovisc or Orthovisc in accordance with the terms of the relevant agreement, and certain rights of first refusal with respect to future products we develop for the treatment of pain associated with osteoarthritis. In exchange, Mitek pays us a transfer price calculated with reference to historical end user prices in the market and a fixed royalty rate per product on their net product sales. As Mitek accounts for a large percentage of our yearly revenue and has unilateral decision making authority over in market activities, including end user pricing and discounts, reimbursement strategy, and overall promotion strategy, actions taken by Mitek could impact our ability to predict and generate revenue and have a material impact on our business, financial condition, and results of operations. We may not succeed in our integration and buildout of our direct sales channel in the United States, and our failure to do so could negatively impact our business and financial results. Since 2019, and with our expanded commercial infrastructure as a result of the Parcus Medical and Arthrosurface acquisitions, we have sold our Joint Preservation and Restoration family directly to customers, including hospitals and ASCs, through our direct sales representatives and large ne2rk of independent third party distributors. This approach was a departure from our historical distribution model in the United States, and we cannot be certain that we will be successful in implementing and executing on this commercial approach or that, even if we are able to implement it, the approach will be successful at scale. We may not be able to attract or retain the sophisticated personnel required for our approach, to identify or negotiate favorable or acceptable terms with distribution agents, to achieve in market pricing at the levels we have targeted, or to timely execute on our strategies for market penetration generally. Our failure to successfully implement and execute on this commercial approach could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition, and results of operations. 17 We are dependent upon marketing and distribution partners and the failure to maintain strategic alliances on acceptable terms will have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition, and results of operations. Our success is dependent, in part, upon the efforts of our marketing, distribution, and logistics partners, including our sales agent partners in the United States, and the terms and conditions of our relationships with such partners. We cannot assure you that our partners, including Mitek, will not seek to renegotiate their current agreements on terms less favorable to us or terminate such agreements. A failure to maintain relationships with our commercial partners on terms satisfactory to us, or at all, could result in a material adverse effect on our operating results. We continue to seek to establish long term partnerships in regions and countries not covered by existing agreements, and we may need to obtain the assistance of additional marketing partners to bring new and existing products to market and to replace certain marketing partners. There can be no assurance that we will be able to identify or engage appropriate distribution or collaboration partners or effectively transition to any such new partnerships. The failure to establish strategic partnerships for the marketing and distribution of our products on acceptable terms and within our planned timeframes could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition, and results of operations. Sales of our products are largely dependent upon third party reimbursement and our performance may be harmed by health care cost containment initiatives or decisions of individual third party payers. In the United States and other foreign markets, health care providers, such as hospitals and physicians, that purchase health care products, such as our products, generally rely on third party payers, including Medicare, Medicaid, and other health insurance and managed care plans, to reimburse all or part of the cost of the health care product. Reimbursement by third party payers, both in the United States and internationally, may depend on a number of factors, including the individual payer determination that the use of our products is clinically useful and cost effective, medically necessary, and not experimental or investigational. Since reimbursement approval is required from each payer individually, seeking such approvals can be a time consuming and costly process, which could require us or our marketing partners to provide supporting scientific, clinical, and cost effectiveness data for the use of our products to each payer separately. Significant uncertainty exists as to the reimbursement status of newly approved health care products, and any failure or delay in obtaining reimbursement approvals can negatively impact sales of our new products. In addition, we cannot be certain that payers who currently provide reimbursement for our products will continue to provide such reimbursement in the future, and such payer decisions could negatively impact the sales of our current or future products. In addition, third party payers are increasingly attempting to contain the costs of health care products and services by limiting both coverage and the level of reimbursement for new therapeutic products and by refusing, in some cases, to provide coverage for uses of approved products for disease indications for which the FDA, or the applicable foreign regulatory agency, has granted marketing approval. Also, the U.S. Congress, certain state legislatures, and certain foreign governments and regulatory agencies have considered reforms, including, among other Item, the potential repeal of the Affordable Care Act or reference drug pricing in the United States, which may affect current reimbursement practices and create additional uncertainty about the pricing of our products, including the potential implementation of controls on health care spending through limitations on the growth of Medicare and Medicaid spending. There can be no assurance that third party reimbursement coverage will be available or adequate for any products or services developed by us. Outside the United States, the success of our products is also dependent in part upon the availability of reimbursement and health care payment systems. Domestic and international reimbursement laws and regulations may change from time to time. Lack of adequate coverage and reimbursement provided by governments and other third party payers for our products and services, including continuing coverage for Monovisc and Orthovisc in the United States, and any change of classification by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services for Orthovisc and Monovisc, could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition, and results of operations. 18 Risks Related to Our Product Development and Regulatory Compliance We are facing a longer than expected pathway to commercialize our Cingal product in the United States, and we may face other unforeseen difficulties in achieving regulatory approval for Cingal, which could affect our business and financial results. In the second quarter of 2018, we received and analyzed the results of our second Phase III clinical trial for Cingal and found that the data did not meet the primary study endpoint of demonstrating a statistically significant difference in pain reduction between Cingal and the approved steroid comp1nt of Cingal at the six month time point. After discussions, FDA indicated that an additional Phase III clinical trial would be necessary to support U.S. marketing approval for Cingal. In 2019, we decided to conduct a pilot study to enable us to evaluate our full scale Phase III clinical trial design, including patient and site selection criteria, and increase the probability of success for the Phase III trial. In September 2020 the first patient has been enrolled in the pilot study. We have experienced and may continue to experience significant delays in patient enrollment, to date mainly as a result of the COVID 19 Pandemic, or the pilot study may otherwise not be successful. If the pilot study is successful, we expect to commence an additional Phase III trial, but we cannot guarantee the success of any additional Phase III trial. Because the results of the pilot study or any additional Phase III trial, or other unforeseen future developments, could have a substantial negative impact on the timeline for and the cost associated with a potential Cingal regulatory approval, our overall business condition, financial results, and competitive position could be affected. Failure to obtain, or any delay in obtaining, FDA or other U.S. and foreign governmental approvals for our products may have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations. Several of our current products under development, and certain future products we may develop, will require clinical trials to determine their safety and efficacy for United States and international marketing approval by regulatory bodies, including the FDA. Product development and approval within the FDA framework takes a number of years and involves the expenditure of substantial resources. There can be no assurance that the FDA will accept submissions related to our new products or the expansion of the indications of our current products, and, even if submissions are accepted, there can be no guarantee that the FDA will grant approval for our new products, on a timely basis, if at all. In addition to regulations enforced by the FDA, we are subject to other existing and future federal, state, local, and foreign regulations applicable to product approval, which may vary significantly across jurisdictions. Additional approval of existing products may be required when changes to such products may affect the safety and effectiveness, including for new indications for use, labeling changes, process or manufacturing changes, the use of a different facility to manufacture, process or package the device, and changes in performance or design specifications. Failure to obtain regulatory approvals of our products, including any changes to existing products, could have an adverse material impact on our business, financial condition, and results of operations. Even if ultimately granted, FDA and international regulatory approvals may be subject to significant, unanticipated delays throughout the regulatory approval process. Internally, we make assumptions regarding product approval timelines, both in the United States and internationally, in our business planning, and any delay in approval could materially affect our competitive position in the relevant product market and our projections related to future business results. We cannot be certain that product approvals, both in the United States and internationally, will not include significant limitations on the product indications, and other claims sought for use, under which the products may be marketed. The relevant approval or clearance may also include other significant conditions of approval such as post market testing, tracking, or surveillance requirements. Any of these factors could significantly impact our competitive position in relation to such products and could have a negative impact on the sales of such products. 19 Once obtained, we cannot guarantee that FDA or international product approvals will not be withdrawn or that relevant agencies will not require other corrective action, and any withdrawal or corrective action could materially affect our business and financial results. Once obtained, marketing approval can be withdrawn by the FDA or comparable foreign regulatory agencies for a number of reasons, including the failure to comply with ongoing regulatory requirements or the occurrence of unforeseen problems following initial approval. Regulatory authorities could also limit or prevent the manufacture or distribution of our products. Any regulatory limitations on the use of our products or any withdrawal or suspension of approval or rescission of approval by the FDA or a comparable foreign regulatory agency could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition, and results of operations. Our operations and products are subject to extensive regulation, compliance with which is costly and time consuming, and our failure to comply may result in substantial penalties, including recalls of our products. The FDA and foreign regulatory bodies impose extensive regulations applicable to our operations and products, including regulations governing product standards, packing requirements, labeling requirements, quality system and manufacturing requirements, import restrictions, tariff regulations, duties, and tax requirements. We cannot assure you that we will be able to achieve and maintain compliance required for FDA, CE marking, or other foreign regulatory approvals for any or all of our operations and products or that we will be able to produce our products in a timely and profitable manner while complying with applicable requirements. Failure to comply with applicable regulatory requirements could result in substantial penalties, including warning letters, fines, injunctions, civil penalties, seizure of products, total or partial suspension of production, refusal to grant pre market clearance or pre market approval for devices or drugs, withdrawal of approvals, and criminal prosecution. Additionally, regulatory authorities have the power to require the recall of our products. It also might be necessary for us, in applicable circumstances, to initiate a voluntary recall per regulatory requirements of 1 or several of our products. The imposition of any of the foregoing penalties, whether voluntarily or involuntary, could have a material negative impact on our business, financial condition, and results of operations. Any changes in FDA or international regulations related to product approval or approval renewal, including those currently under consideration by FDA or those that apply retroactively, could adversely affect our competitive position and materially affect our business and financial results. FDA and foreign regulations depend heavily on administrative interpretation, and we cannot assure you that future interpretations made by the FDA or other regulatory bodies, with possible retroactive effect, will not adversely affect us. Additionally, any changes, whether in interpretation or substance, in existing regulations or policies, or any future adoption of new regulations or policies by relevant regulatory bodies, could prevent or delay approval of our products. In the event our future, or current, products, including HA generally, are classified, or re classified, as human drugs, combination products, or biologics by the FDA or an applicable international regulatory body, the applicable review process related to such products is typically substantially longer and substantially more expensive than the review process to which they are currently subject as medical devices. In 2018, FDA publicly indicated its intent to consider HA products for certain indications for regulation as a drug and has indicated that industry should submit new products or indication expansions to the OCP to designate the appropriate FDA office for review. There exists uncertainty with respect to the final interpretation, implementation, and consequences of this development, and this or any other potential regulatory changes in approach or interpretation similar in substance to those menti1d in this paragraph and affecting our products could materially impact our competitive position, business, and financial results. Additionally, the implementation of the new European Medical Device Regulation, or EU MDR, set to take full effect in 2021, is expected to change several aspects of the existing regulatory framework in Europe. Specifically, the EU MDR will require changes in the clinical evidence required for medical devices, post market clinical follow up evidence, annual reporting of safety information for Class III products, and bi annual reporting for Class II products, Unique Device Identification, or UDI, for all products, submission of core data elements to a European UDI database prior to placement of a device on the market, reclassification of medical devices, and multiple other labeling changes. Approvals for certain of our currently marketed products could be curtailed or withdrawn as a result of the implementation of the EU MDR, and acquiring approvals for new products could be more challenging and costly. Compliance with this and any other requirements could be time consuming and costly, and our failure to comply may subject us to significant liabilities, which could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition, and results of operations. 20 We may rely on third parties to support certain aspects of our clinical trials. If these third parties do not successfully carry out their contractual duties or meet expected deadlines, we may not be able to obtain regulatory approval or commercialize our products, and our business could be substantially harmed. We have hired experienced clinical development and regulatory staff, and we have also retained the services of knowledgeable external service providers, including consultants and clinical research organizations, to develop and supervise our clinical trials and regulatory processes. Despite our internal investment in staffing, we will remain dependent upon these third party contract research organizations to carry out portions of our clinical and preclinical research studies for the foreseeable future. As a result, we have had and will have less control over the conduct of the clinical trials, the timing and completion of the trials, the required reporting of adverse events, and the management of data developed through the trials than would be the case if we were relying entirely on our own staff. Outside parties may have staffing difficulties, may undergo changes in priorities or may become financially distressed, adversely affecting their willingness or ability to conduct our trials. Failure by these third parties to comply with regulatory requirements or to meet timing expectations may require us to repeat clinical or preclinical trials, which would delay the regulatory approval process, or require substantial unexpected expenditures. We are subject to various healthcare laws and regulations, and any failure to comply with applicable laws could subject us to significant liability and harm our business. The sales, marketing and pricing of products and relationships that medical products companies have with healthcare providers are under increased scrutiny around the world. Our industry is subject to various laws and regulations pertaining to healthcare fraud and abuse, including the False Claims Act, the Anti Kickback Statute, the Stark law, the Physician Payments Sunshine Act, the Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, and similar laws and regulations in the U.S. and around the world. In addition, we are subject to various laws concerning anti corruption and anti bribery matters (including the Foreign Corrupt Practices Act), sales to countries or persons subject to economic sanctions and other matters affecting our international operations. Violations of these laws are punishable by criminal and or civil sanctions, including, in some instances, fines, imprisonment and, within the United States, exclusion from participation in government healthcare programs, including Medicare, Medicaid and Veterans Administration health programs. These laws are administered by, among others, the DOJ, the OIG HHS, the SEC, the OFAC, the Bureau of Industry and Security of the U.S. Department of Commerce, and state attorneys general. Any failure to comply with these laws could subject us to significant liabilities, which could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition, and results of operations. We are subject to environmental regulations and any failure to comply with applicable laws could subject us to significant liabilities and harm our business. We are subject to a variety of local, state, federal, and foreign government regulations relating to the storage, discharge, handling, emission, generation, manufacture, and disposal of toxic or other hazardous substances used in the manufacture of our products. Any failure by us to control the use, disposal, removal, or storage of hazardous chemicals or toxic substances could subject us to significant liabilities, which could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition, and results of operations. Risks Related to Our Growth Initiatives We may have difficulty managing our growth. As a result of our activities, we have experienced substantial growth in the number of our employees, the scope of our product portfolio and pipeline, the size of our operating and financial systems, and the geographic area of our operations. This growth has resulted in increased responsibilities for our management. To manage our growth effectively, we must continue to expand our management team, attract, motivate and retain employees, and improve our operating and financial systems. There can be no assurance that our current management systems will be adequate or that we will be able to manage our recent or future growth successfully. Any failure to do so could have a material adverse effect on our business, operating results and financial condition. 21 We may not generate the expected benefits of our acquisitions, and the ongoing integration of those acquisitions could disrupt our ongoing business, distract our management and increase our expenses. Through our acquisitions of Parcus Medical and Arthrosurface, we expanded our product portfolio and pipeline, diversified our business, expanded our commercial infrastructure, entered new markets, and increased the scope of our operations and the number of our employees. The continued successful integration of these other companies into our operations is critical to our future financial performance. This will require that we continue to integrate more closely the companies product offerings and research and development capabilities, retain key employees, assimilate diverse corporate cultures, further integrate management information systems, consolidate the acquired operations and manage geographically dispersed operations, among other things, each of which could pose significant challenges. The difficulty of combining the acquired companies with our company may be increased by the need to integrate personnel, and changes effected in the combination may cause key employees to leave. To succeed in the market for joint preservation and restoration, we must also invest additional resources, primarily in the areas of sales and marketing, to extend name recognition and increase market share. It is possible that the integration process could take longer than anticipated and could result in the loss of valuable employees, additional and unforeseen expenses, the disruption of our ongoing business, processes and systems, or inconsistencies in standards, controls, procedures, practices, policies and compensation arrangements, any of which could adversely affect our ability to achieve the anticipated benefits of the acquisitions. There may be increased risk due to integrating financial reporting and internal control systems. The diversion of the attention of management created by the integration process, any disruptions or other difficulties encountered in the integration process, and unforeseen liabilities or unanticipated problems with the acquired businesses could have a material adverse effect on our business, operating results and financial condition. While we are working diligently to complete integration activities, the employee disruptions, communication challenges and management diversion created by the COVID 19 pandemic present particular challenges to our integration of Arthrosurface and Parcus Medical and could make it difficult to effectively and timely complete our integration goals. We have recorded an impairment to goodwill and a reduction in the fair value of contingent consideration in connection with the acquisitions that will be driven in part by an increase in the significant uncertainty surrounding the effect that COVID 19 will have on near term cash flows of our new subsidiaries. There can be no assurance that these acquisitions will provide the benefits we expect or that we will be able to integrate and develop the operations of Parcus Medical and Arthrosurface successfully. Any failure to do so could have a material adverse effect on our business, operating results and financial condition. We expect to continue to actively explore inorganic growth as a part of our future growth strategy, which exposes us to a variety of risks that could adversely affect our business operations. Our business and future growth strategy includes as an important comp1nt the acquisition of businesses, technologies, services, assets or products that we believe are a strategic fit with or otherwise provide value to our business. We may fund these acquisitions by utilizing our cash, incurring debt, issuing additional shares of our common stock, or by other means. Completed transactions may expose us to a number of risks and expenses, including unanticipated liabilities, amortization expenses related to intangible assets with definite lives, or risks associated with entering new markets with which we have limited experience or where commercial alliances with experienced partners or existing sales channels are not available. Whether or not completed, transactions may result in diversion of management resources otherwise available for ongoing development of our business and significant expenditures. Customer and employee uncertainty about the effects of any acquisitions could harm us. Customers of any companies we acquire may, in response to the consummation of the acquisitions, delay or defer purchasing decisions, which could adversely affect the success of our acquired businesses. Similarly, employees of acquired companies may experience uncertainty about their future roles, which may adversely affect our ability to attract and retain key management, sales, marketing, and technical personnel following an acquisition. 22 As our international sales and operations grow, we could become increasingly subject to additional economic, political, and other risks that could harm our business. Since we manufacture our products for sale worldwide, our business is subject to risks associated with doing business internationally. During 2020, 2019, and 2018, 21%, 21%, and 19%, respectively, of our product sales were to international distributors. We continue to be subject to a variety of risks, which could cause fluctuations in the results of our international and domestic operations. These risks include The impact of recessions and other economic conditions in economies, including impact of COVID 19 pandemic, outside the United States; Instability of foreign economic, political, and labor conditions; Unfavorable labor regulations applicable to our European operations, such as severance and the unenforceability of non competition agreements in the European Union; The impact of strikes, work stoppages, work slowdowns, grievances, complaints, claims of unfair labor practices, or other collective bargaining disputes; Difficulties in complying with restrictions imposed by regulatory or market requirements, tariffs, or other trade barriers or by U.S. export laws; Imposition of government controls limiting the volume of international sales; Longer accounts receivable payment cycles; Potentially adverse tax consequences, including, if required or applicable, difficulties transferring funds generated in non U.S. jurisdictions to the United States in a tax efficient manner; Difficulties in protecting intellectual property, especially in international jurisdictions; Difficulties in managing international operations; and Burdens of complying with a wide variety of foreign laws. Our success depends, in part, on our ability to anticipate and address these and any new risks. We cannot guarantee that these or other factors will not adversely affect our business or operating results. Risks Related to Our Intellectual Property We may be unable to adequately protect our intellectual property rights, which could have a material impact on our business and future financial results. Our efforts to enforce our intellectual property rights may not be successful. We rely on a combination of copyright, trademark, patent, and trade secret laws, confidentiality procedures, and contractual provisions to protect our proprietary rights. Our success will depend, in part, on our ability to obtain and enforce patents and trademarks, to protect trade secrets, to obtain licenses to technology owned by third parties when necessary, and to conduct our business without infringing on the proprietary rights of others. The patent positions of pharmaceutical, medical product, and biotechnology firms, including ours, can be uncertain and involve complex legal and factual questions. There can be no assurance that any patent applications will result in the issuance of patents or, if any patents are issued, that they will provide significant proprietary protection or commercial advantage or will not be circumvented by others. Filing and prosecution of patent applications, litigation to establish the validity and scope of patents, assertion of patent infringement claims against others, and the defense of patent infringement claims by others can be expensive and time consuming. There can be no assurance that, in the event that any claims with respect to any of our patents, if issued, are challenged by 1 or more third parties, any court or patent authority ruling on such challenge will determine that such patent claims are valid and enforceable. An adverse outcome in such litigation or patent review process could cause us to lose exclusivity covered by the disputed rights. If a third party is found to have rights covering products or processes used by us, we could be forced to cease using the technologies or marketing the products covered by such rights, we could be subject to significant liabilities to such third party, and we could be required to license technologies from such third party in order to continue production of the products. Furthermore, even if our patents are determined to be valid, enforceable, and broad in scope, there can be no assurance that competitors will not be able to design around such patents and compete with us using the resulting alternative technology. We have a policy of seeking patent protection for patentable aspects of our proprietary technology. We intend to seek patent protection with respect to products and processes developed in the course of our activities when we believe such protection is in our best interest and when the cost of seeking such protection is not inordinate. However, no assurance can be given that any patent application will be filed, that any filed applications will result in issued patents, or that any issued patents will provide us with a competitive advantage or will not be successfully challenged by third parties. The protections afforded by patents will depend upon their scope and validity, and others may be able to design around our patents. 23 We also rely upon trade secrets and proprietary know how for certain non patented aspects of our technology. To protect such information, we require all employees, consultants, and licensees to enter into confidentiality agreements limiting the disclosure and use of such information. There can be no assurance that these agreements provide meaningful protection or that they will not be breached, that we would have adequate remedies for any such breach, or that our trade secrets, proprietary know how, and our technological advances will not otherwise become known to others. In addition, there can be no assurance that, despite precautions taken by us, others have not and will not obtain access to our proprietary technology. Further, there can be no assurance that third parties will not independently develop substantially equivalent or better technology. There can be no assurance that we will not infringe upon the intellectual property rights of others, which could have a significant impact on our business and financial results. Other entities have filed patent applications for, or have been issued patents concerning, various products or processes in the segments in which we do business. There can be no assurance that the products or processes developed by us will not infringe on the patent rights of others in the future. The cost of defending infringement suits is typically large, and there is no guarantee that any future defense would be successful. In addition, infringement could lead to substantial damages payouts or our inability to produce or market certain of our current or future products. As a result, any such infringement may have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition, and results of operations. Risks Related to the COVID 19 Pandemic Our operations are located in areas impacted by the COVID 19 pandemic, and those operations have been, and may continue to be, adversely affected by the COVID 19 pandemic. The coronavirus has impacted the social and economic framework in the United States and Italy. Our administrative, research and development, and manufacturing operations are principally performed at our U.S. facilities in Massachusetts and Florida. Though our Italian operations represent a relatively small percentage of our consolidated business, we conduct commercial activity, product development, sales, logistics, inventory management and supply chain activities, and other services in our office in Padova, Italy. Our business operations in the United States and Italy are subject to potential business interruptions arising from protective measures that have been taken by Italian, U.S., Massachusetts and Florida regulators and other agencies and governing bodies. Business disruptions elsewhere in the world could also negatively affect the sources and availability of comp1nts and materials that are essential to the operation of our business in both the United States and Italy. Our commercial day to day operations have been impacted due to the worldwide cancellation or delay of elective procedures, and timelines associated with certain clinical studies and research and development programs have been delayed. Stay at home orders, business closures, travel restrictions, supply chain disruptions, employee illness or quarantines, and other extended periods of interruption to our business could result in disruptions to our operations, could cause us to cease or delay operations, and could prevent our customers from receiving shipments or processing payments. To mitigate the spread of COVID 19, we have transiti1d a significant portion of our employee population to a remote work environment, but employees who are unable to work remotely continue to work at our facilities. There can be no assurances that safety measures we have implemented will be sufficient to protect our employees in our workplace or that they may not otherwise be exposed to COVID 19 outside of our workplace. If a number of our essential employees become sick or otherwise unable to continue working during the current or any future epidemic, our operations may be harmed. Also, remote work environment may exacerbate various cybersecurity risks to our business, including an increased demand for information technology resources, an increased risk of phishing and other cybersecurity attacks, and an increased risk of unauthorized dissemination of sensitive personal information or proprietary or confidential information. Extended periods of interruption to our corporate, development or manufacturing facilities due to the COVID 19 pandemic could cause us to lose revenue and market share, which would depress our financial performance and could be difficult to recapture. Our business may also be harmed if travel within, to or from the United States and Italy continues to be restricted or inadvisable. In addition, employee disruptions and remote working environments related to the COVID 19 pandemic have impacted, and are continuing to impact, the efficiency and pace with which we work and develop our product candidates and our manufacturing capabilities. 24 The COVID 19 pandemic has resulted in a significant reduction in the number of elective surgeries being performed, which has decreased the usage of, and revenue from, certain of our products. A significant portion of the demand for our products results from the usage of our products in elective surgeries. As COVID 19 reached a global pandemic level in March 2020, the volume of elective surgery procedures worldwide, including in the U.S. and Western Europe, was declining precipitously, as healthcare systems diverted resources to meet the increasing demands of managing COVID 19 and as patients deferred elective surgeries to avoid the risk of exposure to the coronavirus. The American College of Surgeons, U.S. surgeon general, and other public health bodies have recommended delaying elective surgeries during the COVID 19 pandemic, and surgeons and medical societies are evaluating the risks of minimally invasive surgeries in the presence of infectious diseases. In the fourth quarter of 2020, certain areas of the United States and certain other countries began experiencing increasing infection rates, which makes future results difficult to predict. The decreased number of procedures performed has negatively impacted our revenue and operating results, and it is impossible to reasonably predict when the level of elective procedures will begin to return to pre COVID 19 levels. There is significant uncertainty in light of ongoing infection rates in many areas of the United States and in various international jurisdictions. Procedure volumes have not returned to pre COVID 19 levels and there is no guarantee that the positive trends will continue. As a result, elective procedures may yet again decline substantially in future periods, especially in geographies with substantial COVID 19 infection rates. In the United States, COVID 19 policymaking has been handled largely on a state by state, and in some cases a city by city, basis. The international outlook is similar, as countries are taking varying approaches to combating the pandemic and returning to pre COVID operations. The pace of recovery will be phased and regionally determined based on local orders and the overall impact of COVID 19. A continuation of the decreased level of elective procedures due to COVID 19 will result in a loss of sales and profits and other material adverse effects on our business and operating results. The COVID 19 pandemic could adversely impact our development activities, preclinical studies and clinical trials, which could significantly impair our long term business plans and operating results. Our preclinical activities and clinical trials for our product candidates are planned in geographies that are currently affected by COVID 19. The timely initiation and completion of our preclinical and development activities and clinical trials depend upon the availability of facility access, preclinical and clinical trial sites, researchers and investigators, regulatory agency personnel, and materials, all of which may be adversely affected by the COVID 19 pandemic. The timing of our clinical trials depends on our ability to recruit patients to participate as well as the completion of required follow up periods. The COVID 19 global pandemic has had and may continue to have a sustained impact on our ability to recruit and follow up with patients either due to continued or renewed restrictions on travel or shelter in place orders or policies, or due to changes in patient willingness to participate in trials or travel to study sites during the pandemic. Additionally, COVID 19 related study site policies may create delays or setbacks in our ability to continue to enroll or to dose patients. The timeline for recruiting patients, conducting trials and obtaining regulatory approval of our product candidates may be delayed, which could result in increased costs, delays in advancing our product candidates, delays in testing the effectiveness of our product candidates or termination of the clinical trials altogether. Factors resulting from the COVID 19 pandemic that could delay or otherwise adversely affect the completion of our preclinical activities and the planned activities related to our clinical trials, as well as our business generally, include 25 the potential diversion of healthcare resources away from the conduct of preclinical activities and clinical trials to focus on pandemic concerns, including the availability of necessary materials and the attention of physicians serving as our clinical trial investigators, hospitals serving as our clinical trial sites and hospital staff supporting the conduct of our prospective clinical trials; limitations on travel that could interrupt key preclinical and clinical activities, such as clinical trial site initiations and monitoring, domestic and international travel by employees, contractors or patients to clinical trial sites, including any government imposed travel restrictions or quarantines that will impact the ability or willingness of patients, employees or contractors to travel to our research, manufacturing and clinical trial sites or secure visas or entry permissions, any of which could delay or adversely impact the conduct or progress of our prospective clinical trials; interruption or delays in the operations of the FDA and comparable foreign regulatory agencies, which may impact review, inspection, clearance and approval timelines; interruption in global shipping affecting the transport of clinical trial materials, such as patient samples, product candidates and supplies, to be used in our prospective clinical trials; limitations on our business operations by government authorities that could impact our ability to conduct our preclinical or clinical activities; and business disruptions caused by potential workplace, laboratory and office closures and an increased reliance on employees working from home, disruptions to or delays in ongoing laboratory experiments and operations, staffing shortages, travel limitations, cyber security and data accessibility, or communication or mass transit disruptions, any of which could adversely impact our business operations or delay necessary interactions with local regulators, ethics committees, manufacturing sites, research or clinical trial sites, and other important agencies and contractors. Our global supply chain may be materially adversely impacted due to the COVID 19 pandemic. We rely upon the facilities of our global suppliers to support our business. The COVID 19 pandemic has resulted in significant governmental measures in many countries being implemented to control the spread of COVID 19, including restrictions on manufacturing and the movement of employees. As a result of COVID 19 and the measures designed to contain its spread, our suppliers may not have the materials, capacity, or capability to supply our needed materials and other supplies according to our schedule and specifications. Further, there may be logistics issues, including our ability and our supply chain ability to quickly ramp up production, and transportation demands that may cause further delays. If our suppliers operations are curtailed, we may need to seek alternate sources of supply, which may be more expensive. Alternate sources may not be available or may result in delays in shipments to us from our supply chain and subsequently to our customers, each of which would affect our results of operations. If the duration of the production and supply chain disruption continue for an extended period of time, the impact on our supply chain could have a material adverse effect on our results of operations and cash flows. Risks Related to Ownership of Our Common Stock Our stock price may be highly volatile, and we cannot assure you that market making in our common stock will continue. The market price of shares of our common stock may be highly volatile. Factors such as announcements of new commercial products or technological innovations by us or our competitors, disclosure of results of clinical testing or regulatory proceedings, government regulation and approvals, developments in patent or other proprietary rights, public concern as to the safety of products developed by us, and general market conditions may have a significant effect on the market price of our common stock. We withdrew and have not since provided financial guidance to investors as a result our own uncertainty with respect to projections during the COVID 19 pandemic. This action, as well as general investor uncertainty related to the COVID 19 pandemic, could create volatility and unpredictability in our stock price. The trading price of our common stock could also be subject to wide fluctuations in response to quarter to quarter variations in our operating results, material announcements by us or our competitors, governmental regulatory action, conditions in the health care industry generally or in the medical products industry specifically, or other events or factors, many of which are beyond our control. In addition, the stock market has experienced extreme price and volume fluctuations, which have particularly affected the market prices of many medical products companies and which often have been unrelated to the operating performance of such companies. Our operating results in future quarters may be below the expectations of equity research analysts and investors. In such an event, the price of our common stock would likely decline, perhaps substantially. 26 Our charter documents contain anti takeover provisions that may prevent or delay an acquisition of our company. Our charter documents continue to contain anti takeover provisions that could prevent or delay an acquisition of our company. The provisions include, among others, a classified board of directors, advance notice to the board of stockholder proposals, limitations on the ability of stockholders to remove directors and to call stockholder meetings, and a provision that allows vacancies on the Board of Directors to be filled by vote of a majority of the remaining directors. We are also subject to Section 203 of the Delaware General Corporate Law which, subject to certain exceptions, prohibits a Delaware corporation from engaging in any of a broad range of business combinations with any interested stockholder for a period of 3 years following the date that such stockholder becomes an interested stockholder. Those provisions could have the effect of discouraging a third party from pursuing a non negotiated takeover of our company at a price considered attractive by many stockholders and could have the effect of preventing or delaying a potential acquirer from acquiring control of our company. If securities or industry analysts do not publish or cease publishing research or reports about us, our business, or our market, or if they adversely change their recommendations regarding our stock, our stock price and trading volume could decline. The trading market for our common stock is influenced by the research and reports that securities or industry analysts may publish about us, our business, our market, or our competitors. No person is under any obligation to publish research or reports on us, and any person publishing research or reports on us may discontinue doing so at any time without notice. If adequate research coverage is not maintained on our company or if any of the analysts who cover us downgrade our stock or publish inaccurate or unfavorable research about our business or provide relatively more favorable recommendations about our competitors, our stock price would likely decline. If any analysts who cover us were to cease coverage of our company or fail to regularly publish reports on us, we could lose visibility in the financial markets, which in turn could cause our stock price or trading volume to decline. ITEM 2 PROPERTIES
